Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Identification; report. (a) Each school district must screen every student enrolled in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3 using a screening tool approved by the Department of Education three times each school year: (1) within the first six weeks of the school year; (2) by February 15 each year; and (3) within the last six weeks of the school year. Students enrolled in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3, including multilingual learners, students receiving special education services, and students enrolled in dual language immersion programs, must be universally screened for mastery of foundational reading skills, including phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, oral language, and for characteristics of dyslexia as measured by a screening tool approved by the Department of Education. The screening for characteristics of dyslexia may be integrated with universal screening for mastery of foundational skills and expressive or receptive language mastery. The screening tool used must be a valid and reliable universal screener that is highly correlated with foundational reading skills. For students reading at grade level, beginning in the winter of grade 2, the oral reading fluency screener may be used to assess reading difficulties, including characteristics of dyslexia, without requiring a separate screening of each subcomponent of foundational reading skills. new text begin (b) new text end A district must submit data on student performance in kindergarten, grade 1, grade 2, and grade 3 on foundational reading skillsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin to the Department of Education in the annual local literacy plan submission due on June 15, new text end includingnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end phonemic awareness, phonics, decoding, fluency, and oral language deleted text begin to the Department of Education in the annual local literacy plan submission due on June 15.deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) the number of students reading at grade level; and new text end new text begin (3) the number of students demonstrating typical or above-typical progress, as defined by the approved screening tool. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end For students enrolled in dual language immersion programs: (1) if students are screened in the partner language, they must be screened at the same interval as the screenings in English under paragraph (a); (2) if the program provides instruction in foundational reading skills in English, the students receiving that instruction must be screened in English; (3) if the program provides instruction in foundational reading skills in the partner language, the students receiving that instruction must be screened in the partner language; (4) if no screener is available in the partner language, the districts must identify how students' reading proficiency is assessed and how the districts determine and provide targeted reading instruction in the partner language and supports to students identified as needing additional support in developing mastery of foundational reading skills; and (5) the partner language screening tool must be approved by the district for kindergarten through grade 3 students. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Students in grades 4 and above, including multilingual learners and students receiving special education services, who are not reading at grade level must be screened for reading difficulties, including characteristics of dyslexia, using a screening tool approved by the Department of Education, and must continue to receive evidence-based instruction, interventions, and progress monitoring until the students achieve grade-level proficiency. A parent, in consultation with a teacher, may opt a student out of the literacy screener if the parent and teacher decide that continuing to screen would not be beneficial to the student. In such limited cases, the student must continue to receive progress monitoring and literacy interventions. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Reading screeners in English, and in the predominant languages of district students where practicable, must identify and evaluate students' areas of academic need related to literacy. The district also must monitor the progress and provide reading instruction appropriate to the specific needs of multilingual learners. The district must use an approved, developmentally appropriate, and culturally responsive screener and annually report summary screener results to the commissioner by June 15 in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The district also must include in its local literacy plan under subdivision 4a, a summary of the district's efforts to screen, identify, and provide interventions to students who demonstrate characteristics of dyslexia as measured by a screening tool approved by the Department of Education. Districts are strongly encouraged to use a MTSS framework. With respect to students screened or identified under paragraph (a), the report must include: (1) a summary of the district's efforts to screen for characteristics of reading difficulties, including dyslexia; (2) the number of students universally screened for that reporting year; (3) the number of students demonstrating characteristics of dyslexia for that year; and (4) an explanation of how students identified under this subdivision are provided with alternate instruction and interventions under section 125A.56, subdivision 1. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.302, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Comprehensive assessment system. The commissioner, with advice from experts with appropriate technical qualifications and experience and stakeholders,new text begin including students enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12,new text end must include state-developed tests in the comprehensive assessment system. State-developed tests administered to all students in a subject other than writing must include multiple choice questions. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.305, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Reporting requirements. (a) Reporting of state assessment results must: (1) provide timely, useful, and understandable information on the performance of individual students, schools, school districts, and the state; (2) include a growth indicator of student achievement; and (3) determine whether students have met the state's academic standards. (b) The commissioner must ensure that for annual computer-adaptive assessments: (1) individual student performance data and achievement reports are available within three school days of when students take an assessment except in a year when an assessment reflects new performance standards; (2) growth information is available new text begin and reported new text end for each student deleted text begin from the student's first assessment to each proximate assessment using a constantdeleted text end new text begin in grades 3 through 8, calculated based on the magnitude of change in the student's score on anew text end measurement scalenew text begin that is continuous and vertically aligned across gradesnew text end ; (3) parents, teachers, and school administrators are able to use elementary and middle school student performance data to project students' secondary and postsecondary achievement; and (4) useful diagnostic information about areas of students' academic strengths and weaknesses is available to teachers and school administrators for improving student instruction and indicating the specific skills and concepts that should be introduced and developed for students at given performance levels, organized by strands within subject areas, and aligned to state academic standards. (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the chancellor of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, must establish empirically derived benchmarks on the high school tests that reveal a trajectory toward career and college readiness consistent with section 136F.302, subdivision 1a. The commissioner must disseminate to the public the computer-adaptive assessments and high school test results upon receiving those results. (d) A school, school district, or charter school deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end provide a student's parent access to the student's individual student performance data and achievement report that is made available under paragraph (b), clause (1), when the performance data and report is available to the school, school district, or charter school.new text begin A district or charter school must provide individual student performance reports to a student's parent by email or United States mail by August 15 of each year.new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must ensure that the data required under paragraph (b), clause (1), is: new text end new text begin (1) made available to districts in a file format, or via direct electronic transmission, that a district can directly import into districts' student learning management systems and student information systems; and new text end new text begin (2) displayed in a secure online dashboard that is available to school and district personnel, is updated as new assessment data is available, and is aggregated at the school and district levels. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 120B.35, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. State growth measures; other state measures. (a)(1) The state's educational assessment system measuring individual students' educational growth is based on deleted text begin indicators of current achievement that show growth relative to an individual student's prior achievement. Indicators of achievement and prior achievement must be based on highly reliable statewide or districtwide assessmentsdeleted text end new text begin change in students' scores on a continuous and vertically aligned measurement scale. The assessment system must quantify growth based on the change in scale score from year to year. The commissioner must set a target for annual growth for each grade. The assessment system must enable comparison among each student's growth, each school site's aggregate growth, each district's aggregate growth, and the annual growth targetnew text end . (2) For purposes of paragraphs (b), (c), and (d), the commissioner must analyze and report separate categories of information using the student categories identified under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as most recently reauthorized, and, in addition to "other" for each race and ethnicity, and the Karen community, seven of the most populous Asian and Pacific Islander groups, three of the most populous Native groups, seven of the most populous Hispanic/Latino groups, and five of the most populous Black and African Heritage groups as determined by the total Minnesota population based on the most recent American Community Survey; English learners under section 124D.59; home language; free or reduced-price meals; and all students enrolled in a Minnesota public school who are currently or were previously in foster care, except that such disaggregation and cross tabulation is not required if the number of students in a category is insufficient to yield statistically reliable information or the results would reveal personally identifiable information about an individual student. (b) The commissioner, in consultation with a stakeholder group that includes assessment and evaluation directors, district staff, experts in culturally responsive teaching, and researchers, must implement an appropriate growth model that compares the difference in students' achievement scores over time, and includes criteria for identifying schools and school districts that demonstrate academic progress or progress toward English language proficiency. The model may be used to advance educators' professional development and replicate programs that succeed in meeting students' diverse learning needs. Data on individual teachers generated under the model are personnel data under section 13.43. The model must allow users to: (1) report student growth consistent with this paragraph; and (2) for all student categories, report and compare aggregated and disaggregated state student growth and, under section 120B.11, subdivision 2, clause (2), student learning and outcome data using the student categories identified under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as most recently reauthorized, and other student categories under paragraph (a), clause (2). The commissioner must report measures of student growth and, under section 120B.11, subdivision 2, clause (2), student learning and outcome data, consistent with this paragraph, including the English language development, academic progress, and oral academic development of English learners and their native language development if the native language is used as a language of instruction, and include data on all pupils enrolled in a Minnesota public school course or program who are currently or were previously counted as an English learner under section 124D.59. In addition, the commissioner must report language development outcomes of the target language of instruction other than English for all students who are in a dual language immersion program or who are enrolled in a Minnesota public school course or program in which the objective is improving or maintaining the students' native language. (c) When reporting student performance under section 120B.36, subdivision 1, the commissioner annually, beginning July 1, 2011, must report two core measures indicating the extent to which current high school graduates are being prepared for postsecondary academic and career opportunities: (1) a preparation measure indicating the number and percentage of high school graduates in the most recent school year who completed course work important to preparing them for postsecondary academic and career opportunities, consistent with the core academic subjects required for admission to Minnesota's public colleges and universities as determined by the Office of Higher Education under chapter 136A; and (2) a rigorous coursework measure indicating the number and percentage of high school graduates in the most recent school year who successfully completed one or more college-level advanced placement, international baccalaureate, postsecondary enrollment options including concurrent enrollment, other rigorous courses of study under section 120B.021, subdivision 1a, or industry certification courses or programs. When reporting the core measures under clauses (1) and (2), the commissioner must also analyze and report separate categories of information using the student categories identified under the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as most recently reauthorized, and other student categories under paragraph (a), clause (2). (d) When reporting student performance under section 120B.36, subdivision 1, the commissioner annually, beginning July 1, 2014, must report summary data on school safety and students' engagement and connection at school, consistent with the student categories identified under paragraph (a), clause (2). The summary data under this paragraph are separate from and must not be used for any purpose related to measuring or evaluating the performance of classroom teachers. The commissioner, in consultation with qualified experts on student engagement and connection and classroom teachers, must identify highly reliable variables that generate summary data under this paragraph. The summary data may be used at school, district, and state levels only. Any data on individuals received, collected, or created that are used to generate the summary data under this paragraph are nonpublic data under section 13.02, subdivision 9. (e) For purposes of statewide educational accountability, the commissioner must identify and report measures that demonstrate the success of learning year program providers under sections 123A.05 and 124D.68, among other such providers, in improving students' graduation outcomes. The commissioner, beginning July 1, 2015, must annually report summary data on: (1) the four- and six-year graduation rates of students under this paragraph; (2) the percent of students under this paragraph whose progress and performance levels are meeting career and college readiness benchmarks under section 120B.307; and (3) the success that learning year program providers experience in: (i) identifying at-risk and off-track student populations by grade; (ii) providing successful prevention and intervention strategies for at-risk students; (iii) providing successful recuperative and recovery or reenrollment strategies for off-track students; and (iv) improving the graduation outcomes of at-risk and off-track students. The commissioner may include in the annual report summary data on other education providers serving a majority of students eligible to participate in a learning year program. (f) The commissioner, in consultation with recognized experts with knowledge and experience in assessing the language proficiency and academic performance of all English learners enrolled in a Minnesota public school course or program who are currently or were previously counted as an English learner under section 124D.59, must identify and report appropriate and effective measures to improve current categories of language difficulty and assessments, and monitor and report data on students' English proficiency levels, program placement, and academic language development, including oral academic language. (g) When reporting four- and six-year graduation rates, the commissioner or school district must disaggregate the data by student categories according to paragraph (a), clause (2). (h) A school district must inform parents and guardians that volunteering information on student categories not required by the most recent reauthorization of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act is optional and will not violate the privacy of students or their families, parents, or guardians. The notice must state the purpose for collecting the student data.